Utah statutes.
63A-2-406.   Rulemaking on giving priority to state and local agencies in purchasing surplus property -- Rulemaking on the sale or use of a personal handheld electronic device.

In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the division shall make rules:

(1)  giving state and local agencies priority to purchase surplus property for a 30-day period except for personal handheld electronic devices under Subsection (2); and

(2)  allowing the sale of a personal handheld electronic device to a user who:

(a)  is provided the device as part of the user's employment; and

(b)  subsequently makes a change in employment status including, departure, retirement, or transfer to another agency within state government.

